sublime/Russian-English.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY '-.aAbBcCdDeEfFgGhHiIjJkKlLmMnNoOpPqQrRsStTuUvVwWxXyYzZаАбБвВгГдДеЕёЁжЖзЗиИйЙкКлЛмМнНоОпПрРсСтТуУфФхХцЦчЧшШщЩъЪыЫьЬэЭюЮяЯ

PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4 0 trans .

PFX a Y 1
PFX a 0 mis .

PFX A Y 3
PFX A 0 re .
PFX A 0 re [^e]
PFX A 0 re- e

PFX C Y 3
PFX C 0 de .
PFX C 0 de [^e]
PFX C 0 de- e

PFX c Y 1
PFX c 0 over .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E 0 dis .

PFX e Y 1
PFX e 0 out .

PFX F Y 6
PFX F 0 co [aeiouh]
PFX F 0 col l
PFX F 0 com [bmp]
PFX F 0 con .
PFX F 0 con [^abehilmopru].
PFX F 0 cor r

PFX f Y 2
PFX f 0 under [^r]
PFX f 0 under- r

PFX I Y 5
PFX I 0 il l
PFX I 0 im [bmp]
PFX I 0 in .
PFX I 0 in [^blmpr]
PFX I 0 ir r

PFX K Y 2
PFX K 0 pre .
PFX K 0 pro .

PFX O Y 1
PFX O 0 non- .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 un .

REP 107
REP a ei
REP a ey
REP ai ie
REP air are
REP air ear
REP air ere
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP cc k
REP ce ts
REP ch k
REP ch s
REP ch te
REP ch ti
REP ch tu
REP ci s
REP ck qu
REP ck que
REP dg j
REP di j
REP ear air
REP ear are
REP ear ere
REP ear ier
REP eau o
REP ee i
REP eg e.g.
REP ei a
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP eness ity
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ew o
REP ew oo
REP ew u
REP ew ue
REP ew ui
REP ey a
REP f gh
REP f ph
REP f ugh
REP ff ugh
REP ge j
REP gg j
REP gh f
REP ght t
REP i ee
REP i igh
REP i uy
REP ie ai
REP ie i.e.
REP ier ear
REP ieu oo
REP ieu u
REP igh i
REP j dg
REP j di
REP j ge
REP j gg
REP k cc
REP k ch
REP k qu
REP kw qu
REP leness ility
REP ness ity
REP ness ivity
REP o eau
REP o ew
REP oe u
REP og ogue
REP ok OK
REP oo ew
REP oo ieu
REP oo u
REP oo ui
REP ph f
REP qu k
REP qu w
REP s ch
REP s ci
REP s ti
REP shun cion
REP shun sion
REP shun tion
REP ss z
REP t ght
REP te ch
REP ti ch
REP ti s
REP ts ce
REP tu ch
REP u ew
REP u ieu
REP u oe
REP u oo
REP ue ew
REP uf ough
REP uff ough
REP ui ew
REP ui oo
REP uy i
REP w qu
REP w ugh
REP z ss

SFX - Y 22
SFX - 0 ization [^aemsy]
SFX - 0 ization [^i]s
SFX - 0 ization [^u]m
SFX - 0 ization [aeiou]y
SFX - 0 izations [^aemsy]
SFX - 0 izations [^i]s
SFX - 0 izations [^u]m
SFX - 0 izations [aeiou]y
SFX - 0 tization a
SFX - 0 tizations a
SFX - e ization [^l]e
SFX - e ization [aeiou]le
SFX - e izations [^l]e
SFX - e izations [aeiou]le
SFX - le ilization [^aeiou]le
SFX - le ilizations [^aeiou]le
SFX - s zation is
SFX - s zations is
SFX - um ization um
SFX - um izations um
SFX - y ization [^aeiou]y
SFX - y izations [^aeiou]y

SFX + Y 22
SFX + 0 izability [^aemsy]
SFX + 0 izability [^i]s
SFX + 0 izability [^u]m
SFX + 0 izability [aeiou]y
SFX + 0 izable [^aemsy]
SFX + 0 izable [^i]s
SFX + 0 izable [^u]m
SFX + 0 izable [aeiou]y
SFX + 0 tizability a
SFX + 0 tizable a
SFX + e izability [^l]e
SFX + e izability [aeiou]le
SFX + e izable [^l]e
SFX + e izable [aeiou]le
SFX + le ilizability [^aeiou]le
SFX + le ilizable [^aeiou]le
SFX + s zability is
SFX + s zable is
SFX + um izability um
SFX + um izable um
SFX + y izability [^aeiou]y
SFX + y izable [^aeiou]y

SFX 1 Y 9
SFX 1 0 atically [aeiou]m
SFX 1 0 ically [^aeiou]m
SFX 1 0 ically [^aemry]
SFX 1 0 ically [^e]r
SFX 1 0 tically ma
SFX 1 a ically [^m]a
SFX 1 e ically e
SFX 1 er rically er
SFX 1 y ically y

SFX 2 Y 21
SFX 2 0 biness [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 2 0 diness [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 2 0 finess [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 2 0 giness [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 2 0 iness [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 2 0 iness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 2 0 iness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 2 0 iness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 2 0 iness [aeiouy]e
SFX 2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 2 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 2 0 liness [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 2 0 miness [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 2 0 niness [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX 2 0 piness [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 2 0 riness [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX 2 0 siness [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 2 0 tiness [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX 2 0 viness [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 2 0 ziness [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 2 e iness [^aeiouy]e

SFX 3 Y 20
SFX 3 0 ist [aeiou]e
SFX 3 0 ist [aeioubp]y
SFX 3 0 ists [^eoy]
SFX 3 0 ist's [^eoy]
SFX 3 0 ists [aeiou]e
SFX 3 0 ist's [aeiou]e
SFX 3 0 ists [aeioubp]y
SFX 3 0 ist's [aeioubp]y
SFX 3 ce tist ce
SFX 3 ce tists ce
SFX 3 ce tist's ce
SFX 3 e ist [^aceiou]e
SFX 3 e ists [^aceiou]e
SFX 3 e ist's [^aceiou]e
SFX 3 o ist o
SFX 3 o ists o
SFX 3 o ist's o
SFX 3 y ist [^aeioubp]y
SFX 3 y ists [^aeioubp]y
SFX 3 y ist's [^aeioubp]y

SFX 5 Y 15
SFX 5 0 swoman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 swoman [bdknmt]
SFX 5 0 swoman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 swoman's [bdknmt]
SFX 5 0 swomen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 swomen [bdknmt]
SFX 5 0 woman [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 woman [^bdeknmt]
SFX 5 0 woman [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 woman's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 woman's [^bdeknmt]
SFX 5 0 woman's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 women [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 5 0 women [^bdeknmt]
SFX 5 0 women [^bdklmnt]e

SFX 6 Y 3
SFX 6 0 ful [^y]
SFX 6 0 ful [aeiou]y
SFX 6 y iful [^aeiou]y

SFX 7 Y 9
SFX 7 0 able [^acegilou]e
SFX 7 0 able [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 7 0 able [^cely]
SFX 7 0 able [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 7 0 able [aeiou]y
SFX 7 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 7 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 7 e able [acegilou]e
SFX 7 y iable [^aeiou]y

SFX 8 Y 44
SFX 8 0 ize [^aemsy]
SFX 8 0 ize [^i]s
SFX 8 0 ize [^u]m
SFX 8 0 ize [aeiou]y
SFX 8 0 ized [^aemsy]
SFX 8 0 ized [^i]s
SFX 8 0 ized [^u]m
SFX 8 0 ized [aeiou]y
SFX 8 0 izes [^aemsy]
SFX 8 0 izes [^i]s
SFX 8 0 izes [^u]m
SFX 8 0 izes [aeiou]y
SFX 8 0 izing [^aemsy]
SFX 8 0 izing [^i]s
SFX 8 0 izing [^u]m
SFX 8 0 izing [aeiou]y
SFX 8 0 tize a
SFX 8 0 tized a
SFX 8 0 tizes a
SFX 8 0 tizing a
SFX 8 e ize [^l]e
SFX 8 e ize [aeiou]le
SFX 8 e ized [^l]e
SFX 8 e ized [aeiou]le
SFX 8 e izes [^l]e
SFX 8 e izes [aeiou]le
SFX 8 e izing [^l]e
SFX 8 e izing [aeiou]le
SFX 8 le ilize [^aeiou]le
SFX 8 le ilized [^aeiou]le
SFX 8 le ilizes [^aeiou]le
SFX 8 le ilizing [^aeiou]le
SFX 8 s ze is
SFX 8 s zed is
SFX 8 s zes is
SFX 8 s zing is
SFX 8 um ize um
SFX 8 um ized um
SFX 8 um izes um
SFX 8 um izing um
SFX 8 y ize [^aeiou]y
SFX 8 y ized [^aeiou]y
SFX 8 y izes [^aeiou]y
SFX 8 y izing [^aeiou]y

SFX 9 Y 33
SFX 9 0 izer [^aemsy]
SFX 9 0 izer [^i]s
SFX 9 0 izer [^u]m
SFX 9 0 izer [aeiou]y
SFX 9 0 izers [^aemsy]
SFX 9 0 izer's [^aemsy]
SFX 9 0 izers [^i]s
SFX 9 0 izer's [^i]s
SFX 9 0 izers [^u]m
SFX 9 0 izer's [^u]m
SFX 9 0 izers [aeiou]y
SFX 9 0 izer's [aeiou]y
SFX 9 0 tizer a
SFX 9 0 tizers a
SFX 9 0 tizer's a
SFX 9 e izer [^l]e
SFX 9 e izer [aeiou]le
SFX 9 e izers [^l]e
SFX 9 e izer's [^l]e
SFX 9 e izers [aeiou]le
SFX 9 e izer's [aeiou]le
SFX 9 le ilizer [^aeiou]le
SFX 9 le ilizers [^aeiou]le
SFX 9 le ilizer's [^aeiou]le
SFX 9 s zer is
SFX 9 s zers is
SFX 9 s zer's is
SFX 9 um izer um
SFX 9 um izers um
SFX 9 um izer's um
SFX 9 y izer [^aeiou]y
SFX 9 y izers [^aeiou]y
SFX 9 y izer's [^aeiou]y

SFX A Y 104
SFX A 0 а в
SFX A 0 а ин
SFX A 0 о в
SFX A 0 о ин
SFX A 0 ого ин
SFX A 0 ой в
SFX A 0 ой ин
SFX A 0 ом в
SFX A 0 ом ин
SFX A 0 ому ин
SFX A 0 у в
SFX A 0 у ин
SFX A 0 ы в
SFX A 0 ы ин
SFX A 0 ым в
SFX A 0 ым ин
SFX A 0 ыми в
SFX A 0 ыми ин
SFX A 0 ых в
SFX A 0 ых ин
SFX A ий ая [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ая [жшщч]ий
SFX A ий его [жнршщч]ий
SFX A ий ее [жншщч]ий
SFX A ий ей [жншщч]ий
SFX A ий ем [жнршщч]ий
SFX A ий ему [жнршщч]ий
SFX A ий ею [жншщч]ий
SFX A ий ого [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ое [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ой [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ом [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ому [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ою [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ую [гкх]ий
SFX A ий ую [жшщч]ий
SFX A ий юю ний
SFX A ий яя ний
SFX A ийся аяся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся егося [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся ееся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся ейся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся емся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся емуся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся еюся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся иеся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся имися [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся имся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся ихся [шщ]ийся
SFX A ийся уюся [шщ]ийся
SFX A й е [гкх]ий
SFX A й е [жнршщч]ий
SFX A й е ый
SFX A й м [гкх]ий
SFX A й м [жнршщч]ий
SFX A й м ый
SFX A й ми [гкх]ий
SFX A й ми [жнршщч]ий
SFX A й ми ый
SFX A й х [гкх]ий
SFX A й х [жнршщч]ий
SFX A й х ый
SFX A й ю ой
SFX A ой ая ой
SFX A ой ие [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой им [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ими [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой их [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ого ой
SFX A ой ое ой
SFX A ой ом ой
SFX A ой ому ой
SFX A ой ую ой
SFX A ой ые [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ым [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ыми [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ой ых [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX A ом ая ом
SFX A ом ие [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX A ом ий [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX A ом им [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX A ом ими [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX A ом их [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX A ом ого ом
SFX A ом ое ом
SFX A ом ому ом
SFX A ом ые [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX A ом ый [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX A ом ым [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX A ом ыми [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX A ом ых [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX A ый ая ый
SFX A ый его цый
SFX A ый ее цый
SFX A ый ей цый
SFX A ый ем цый
SFX A ый ему цый
SFX A ый ого [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ое [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ой [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ом [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ому [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ою [^ц]ый
SFX A ый ую ый

SFX B Y 20
SFX B 0 ability [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX B 0 ability [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy]
SFX B 0 ability [acegilou]e
SFX B 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX B 0 ability [aeiou]y
SFX B 0 able [^aeiou]
SFX B 0 able [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX B 0 able [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy]
SFX B 0 able [acegilou]e
SFX B 0 able [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX B 0 able [aeiou]y
SFX B 0 able ee
SFX B 0 bability [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX B 0 bable [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX B 0 dability [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX B 0 dable [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX B 0 fability [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX B 0 fable [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX B 0 gability [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX B 0 gable [^aeio][aeiou]g

SFX b Y 2
SFX b 0 ible [^e]
SFX b 0 ible [aeiou]e

SFX B Y 29
SFX B 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX B 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX B 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX B 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX B 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX B 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX B 0 mability [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX B 0 mable [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX B 0 nability [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX B 0 nable [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX B 0 pability [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX B 0 pable [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX B 0 rability [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX B 0 rable [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX B 0 sability [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX B 0 sable [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX B 0 tability [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX B 0 table [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX B 0 vability [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX B 0 vable [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX B 0 zability [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX B 0 zable [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX B 0 те [^ст]ь
SFX B 0 те [ий]
SFX B e ability [^a]te
SFX B e ability [^acegilotu]e
SFX B e able [^a]te
SFX B e able [^acegilotu]e
SFX B e able [^aeiou]e

SFX b Y 1
SFX b e ible [^aeiou]e

SFX B Y 37
SFX B te bility ate
SFX B te ble ate
SFX B y iability [^aeiou]y
SFX B y iable [^aeiou]y
SFX B ем ая [чхшщкжг]ем
SFX B ем его ем
SFX B ем ее ем
SFX B ем ему ем
SFX B ем ие ем
SFX B ем ий ем
SFX B ем им ем
SFX B ем ими ем
SFX B ем их ем
SFX B ем яя [^чхшщкжг]ем
SFX B ить и ить
SFX B оть и оть
SFX B оть ите оть
SFX B оться ись оться
SFX B оться итесь оться
SFX B сь тесь ись
SFX B ся тесь [^т]ься
SFX B ся тесь йся
SFX B ть й [аея]ть
SFX B ть йте [аея]ть
SFX B ться йся [аея]ться
SFX B ться йтесь [аея]ться
SFX B ться сь иться
SFX B ться тесь иться
SFX B уть и уть
SFX B уть ите уть
SFX B уться ись уться
SFX B уться итесь уться
SFX B ыть ой ыть
SFX B ыть ойте ыть
SFX B ыться ойся ыться
SFX B ыться ойтесь ыться
SFX B ь е ить

SFX C Y 12
SFX C ая ие [чхшщкжг]ая
SFX C ая ий [чхшщкжг]ая
SFX C ая им [чхшщкжг]ая
SFX C ая ими [чхшщкжг]ая
SFX C ая их [чхшщкжг]ая
SFX C ая ой ая
SFX C ая ую ая
SFX C ая ые [^чхшщкжг]ая
SFX C ая ый [^чхшщкжг]ая
SFX C ая ым [^чхшщкжг]ая
SFX C ая ыми [^чхшщкжг]ая
SFX C ая ых [^чхшщкжг]ая

SFX D Y 2
SFX D 0 bed [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX D 0 d [^e]e

SFX d Y 1
SFX d 0 d e

SFX D Y 3
SFX D 0 d e
SFX D 0 ded [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX D 0 ed [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]

SFX d Y 1
SFX d 0 ed [^aeiou][cl]

SFX D Y 1
SFX D 0 ed [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]

SFX d Y 1
SFX d 0 ed [^ecly]

SFX D Y 2
SFX D 0 ed [^ey]
SFX D 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]

SFX d Y 1
SFX d 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][cl]

SFX D Y 1
SFX D 0 ed [aeio][eiou]l

SFX d Y 1
SFX d 0 ed [aeiou]y

SFX D Y 4
SFX D 0 ed [aeiou]y
SFX D 0 ed [aeo]al
SFX D 0 fed [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX D 0 ged [^aeio][aeiou]g

SFX d Y 5
SFX d 0 ing [^aeiou][cl]
SFX d 0 ing [^ecl]
SFX d 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX d 0 ing [eoy]e
SFX d 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c

SFX D Y 2
SFX D 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX D 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]k
